Utah statutes.
15-7-3.   Purpose.
(1) The Code provides that interest with respect to certain obligations may
not be exempt from federal income taxation unless they are in registered form.
It is therefore a matter of state concern that public entities be authorized
to provide for the issuance of obligations in registered form. It is a purpose
of this act to empower all public entities to establish and maintain a system
which permits obligations to be issued in registered form within the meaning
of the applicable Code provisions.
(2)  It is further a purpose of this act to empower the establishment and
maintenance of differing systems of registration of obligations, including
system incidents, so as to accommodate the differing impacts upon issuers and
varieties of obligations. It is further a purpose of this act to authorize
systems that will facilitate the prompt and accurate transfer of registered
public obligations and developing practices with regard to the registration
and transfer of registered public obligations.
